Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,234.01
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the First-Time Home Buyer Savings Account Act.

Laws 2026, LB803, § 8.
July 18, 2026